Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1805
Permit; renewal; fee.

Such permit shall be renewed annually in the same manner and upon the payment of the same fee as provided for original issuance. Such renewal shall become due on the first day of January of each year and delinquent on March 1 of each year.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 5, p. 2527;

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 40.